New Jersey, session 222, S1495.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.167 (C.2C:58-2.12) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. The Attorney General, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall establish a suicide prevention course curriculum and suicide prevention informational materials for firearm retail dealers who sell firearms or operate a firing range in this State. b.    The Attorney General shall notify firearm retail dealers of the course curriculum established pursuant to subsection a. of this section and encourage their participation in a training course. The training course shall be made available by the Department of Law and Public Safety in a classroom setting or on an Internet website. The training course shall include: (1)   methods to recognize signs of suicidal tendencies or characteristics in firearm purchasers or renters; (2)   suicide intervention strategies to reduce the incidence of attempted and completed suicides among persons purchasing or renting a firearm; and (3)   information regarding available community services and counseling programs developed to prevent suicide. c.     The Attorney General shall distribute the suicide prevention informational materials established pursuant to subsection a. of this section to each firearm retail dealer who sells firearms or operates a firing range in this State.  The informational materials shall advise customers on methods to prevent firearms from being accessible to a friend or family member in crisis.  A firearm retail dealer who sells firearms or operates a firing range shall make available the informational materials at each retail purchase counter. d.    A person shall not have a cause of action for any loss or damages caused by any act or omission resulting from participation in any training or the distribution of informational materials undertaken or attempted in good faith pursuant to this section, unless such loss or damages were caused by willful or wanton misconduct. (cf: P.L.2019, c.167, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.